Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4085.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 515. (1) In an industrial zone, digital asset mining is a permitted use of property and not subject to special land use or conditional use approval. (2) A local unit of government shall not set a specific limit on decibels generated from a digital mining business other than any applicable general limits set for sound pollution that apply to industrial zones. (3) A local unit of government shall not impose any zoning restriction, requirement, or imposition on a digital asset mining business that is not a restriction, requirement, or imposition for a data center located in the same zoning district. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Blockchain" means data that is both of the following: (i) Shared across a network to create a ledger of verified transactions or information among network participants linked using cryptography to maintain the integrity of the ledger and to execute other functions. (ii) Distributed among network participants in an automated fashion to concurrently update network participants on the state of the ledger and any other functions. (b) "Blockchain protocol" means any executable software deployed to a blockchain composed of a source code that is publicly available and accessible, including a smart contract or any network of smart contracts. (c) "Data center" means a building or premises in which the majority of the use of the building or premises is occupied by computers, telecommunications, or related equipment, including, but not limited to, supporting equipment, where digital information is processed, transferred, and stored. (d) "Digital asset mining" means using electricity to power a computer or node for the purpose of securing a blockchain. (e) "Digital asset mining business" means a group of computers working together that consume more than 1 megawatt of energy for the purpose of securing a blockchain protocol. (f) "Node" means a computational device that contains and updates a copy of a blockchain.